Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3561
Hospital districts; bonds; issuance; statement; contents.

The board of directors of any hospital district in which any bonds may be voted shall, before the issuance of such bonds, make a written statement of all proceedings relative to the vote upon the issuance of such bonds and the notice of the election, the manner and time of giving notice, the question submitted, and the result of the canvass of the vote on the proposition pursuant to which it is proposed to issue such bonds, together with a full statement of the taxable valuation, the number of persons residing within the district, and the total bonded indebtedness of the hospital district voting such bonds. Such statement shall be certified to under oath by the board of directors.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 8, p. 354;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 113;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.56;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 119;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 21.